Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2. Anatomical Gifts.
§ 32.1-291.21.
Effect of anatomical gift on advance health-care directive.

In this section:“Advance health-care directive” means an advance directive executed by a prospective donor as provided in the Health Care Decisions Act (§ 54.1-2981 et seq.).“Declaration” means a record signed by a prospective donor specifying the circumstances under which a life support system may be withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor.“Health care decision” means any decision regarding the health care of the prospective donor.

If a prospective donor has a declaration or an advance health-care directive and the terms of the declaration or directive and the express or implied terms of a potential anatomical gift are in conflict with regard to the administration of measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part for transplantation or therapy, the prospective donor’s attending physician and the prospective donor shall confer to resolve the conflict. If the prospective donor is incapable of resolving the conflict, an agent acting under the prospective donor’s declaration or directive, or, if there is no declaration or directive, or the agent is not reasonably available, another person authorized by law other than this Act, to make health care decisions on behalf of the prospective donor, shall act for the donor to resolve the conflict. The conflict shall be resolved as expeditiously as possible. Information relevant to the resolution of the conflict may be obtained from the appropriate procurement organization and any other person authorized to make an anatomical gift for the prospective donor under §

32.1-291.9

. Before resolution of the conflict, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of an organ for transplantation or therapy may not be withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor if withholding or withdrawing the measures is not contraindicated by appropriate end-of-life care.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2008, c. 82.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 82 added the paragraphs defining “Declaration” and “Health care decision” in subsection A, and rewrote subsection B.

§ 32.1-291.22.
Cooperation between Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and procurement organization.

The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and procurement organizations shall cooperate with each other to maximize the opportunity to recover anatomical gifts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner receives notice from a procurement organization that an anatomical gift might be available or was made with respect to a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and a postmortem examination is going to be performed, unless the Chief Medical Examiner or an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner denies recovery in accordance with §

32.1-291.23

, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall, when practicable, cause a postmortem examination of the body or the part to be conducted in a manner and within a period compatible with its preservation for the purposes of the gift.

A part may not be removed from the body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner for transplantation, therapy, research, or education unless the part is the subject of an anatomical gift. The body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner may not be delivered to a person for research or education unless the body is the subject of an anatomical gift. This subsection does not preclude the Chief Medical Examiner or an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner from performing the medicolegal autopsy upon the body or parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner or from using the body or parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner for the purposes of education, training, and research.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2014, c. 583.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 substituted “the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” and “Chief Medical Examiner or an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner” throughout the section; in subsection B inserted “cause,” “to be conducted,” and deleted “conduct” following “shall”; and deleted “required by the medical examiner” at the end of subsection C.

§ 32.1-291.23.
Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is under jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

Upon request of a procurement organization, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall release to the procurement organization the name, contact information, and available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner. If the decedent’s body or part is medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall release postmortem examination results to the procurement organization. The procurement organization may make a subsequent disclosure of the postmortem examination results or other information received from the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner only if relevant to transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner may conduct a medicolegal investigation by reviewing all medical records, laboratory test results, x-rays, other diagnostic results, and other information that any person possesses about a donor or prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

A person that has any information requested by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to subsection B shall provide that information as expeditiously as possible to allow the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner to conduct the medicolegal investigation within a period compatible with the preservation of parts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a part of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and a postmortem examination is not required, or the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner determines that a postmortem examination is required but that the recovery of the part that is the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely removal of the part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and procurement organizations shall enter into an agreement setting forth protocols and procedures to govern relations between the parties when an anatomical gift of a part from a decedent under the jurisdiction of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner has been or might be made, but the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner believes that the recovery of the part could interfere with the postmortem investigation into the decedent’s cause or manner of death. Decisions regarding the recovery of organs, tissue and eyes from such a decedent shall be made in accordance with the agreement. In the event that an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner denies recovery of an anatomical gift, the procurement organization may request the Chief Medical Examiner to reconsider the denial and to permit the recovery to proceed. The parties shall evaluate the effectiveness of the protocols and procedures at regular intervals but no less frequently than every two years.

If the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner allows recovery of a part under subsection D or E, the procurement organization, upon request, shall cause the physician or technician who removes the part to provide the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner with a record describing the condition of the part, a biopsy, a photograph, and any other information and observations that would assist in the postmortem examination.

If the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is required to be present at a removal procedure under subsection E, upon request the procurement organization requesting the recovery of the part shall reimburse the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner for the additional costs incurred in complying with subsection E.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2014, c. 583.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 substituted “Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner” throughout the section; in subsection B, substituted “Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner that the medical examiner determines may be relevant to the investigation”; in subsection E, substituted “an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner” for “the medical examiner”; and in subsections F and G, substituted “Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner or designee.”

§ 32.1-291.24.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.25.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede § 101(a) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-292.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 959.

§ 32.1-292.1.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-292.2.
The Virginia Donor Registry.

In order to save lives by reducing the shortage of organs and tissues for transplantation and to implement cost savings for patients and various state agencies by eliminating needless bureaucracy, there is hereby established the Virginia Donor Registry (hereinafter referred to as the Registry), which shall be created, compiled, operated, maintained, and modified as necessary by the Virginia Transplant Council in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Health and the administration of the Department of Health. At its sole discretion, the Virginia Transplant Council may contract with a third party or parties to create, compile, operate, maintain or modify the Registry. Pertinent information on all Virginians who have indicated a willingness to donate organs and tissues in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.) shall be compiled, maintained, and modified as necessary in the Registry by the Virginia Transplant Council.

The Registry and all information therein shall be confidential and subject to access only by personnel of the Department of Health and designated organ procurement organizations, eye banks, and tissue banks, operating in or serving Virginia that are members of the Virginia Transplant Council, for the purpose of identifying and determining the suitability of a potential donor according to the provisions of subdivision B 4 of §

32.1-127

or subsection G of § 46.2-342.

The purpose of the Registry shall include, but not be limited to:

Providing a means of recovering an anatomical gift for transplantation, therapy, education or research as authorized by the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.) and subsection G of § 46.2-342; and

Collecting data to develop and evaluate the effectiveness of educational initiatives promoting organ, eye, and tissue donation that are conducted or coordinated by the Virginia Transplant Council or its members.

The Board, in consultation with the Virginia Transplant Council, shall promulgate regulations necessary to create, compile, operate, maintain, modify as necessary, and administer the Virginia Donor Registry. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

Recording the data subject’s full name, address, sex, birth date, age, driver’s license number or unique identifying number, and other pertinent identifying personal information;

Authorizing the Virginia Transplant Council to analyze Registry data under research protocols that are designed to identify and assess the effectiveness of mechanisms to promote and increase organ, eye, and tissue donation within the Commonwealth; and

Providing that any Virginian whose name has been placed in the registry may have his name deleted by filing an appropriate form with the Virginia Transplant Council or in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.).

History.

2000, cc. 481, 490; 2006, c. 166; 2007, cc. 92, 907; 2008, c. 82; 2009, c. 834; 2010, cc. 25, 55; 2016, cc. 135, 743.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 166 provides: “Whereas, in past years, the organ procurement organizations and eye banks of Virginia were required to contact the Virginia State Police to have the Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV) records checked for organ and tissue donor designations; however, in 2000, the General Assembly mandated the establishment of an organ and tissue donor registry by the Virginia Transplant Council; and

“Whereas, requiring two years to develop, online services were, remarkably, initiated shortly thereafter in 2003, thus allowing Virginians to register online as organ and tissue donors; and

“Whereas, with the budget crisis of 2003, the Virginia Transplant Council lost its funding and its staff while still retaining its statutory responsibilities for the maintenance of the donor registry; and

“Whereas, the members of the Virginia Transplant Council have continued to share the costs of maintaining the organ and tissue donor registry; however, funds to maintain the valuable services of the organ and tissue donor registry will soon be depleted, leaving the registry dormant, its usefulness to deteriorate, and eventually causing its closure; and

“Whereas, the donor registry has saved money by eliminating the need to contact the State Police for information held by the Department of Motor Vehicles, thereby freeing up law-enforcement officers for important public safety functions; and

“Whereas, analysis of registry data proves that, since its initiation, the donor registry has saved lives by increasing donations and improving family acceptance of organ and tissue donation when the loved one has made an easily ascertainable and verifiable decision; now, therefore,”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 166 rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “personnel of the Department of Health” for “personnel the Department” and “that” for “and which” and inserted “and determining the suitability of” and “subdivision B 4 of”; added the language beginning “that are conducted” at the end of subdivision C 2; and in subsection D, in the first sentence, inserted “create, compile, maintain, modify as necessary, and” and substituted “Virginia Donor Registry” for “organ and tissue donor registry,” and in subdivision D 2, substituted “Authorizing” for “Delegating authority to” and “that are designed to identify and assess the effectiveness of mechanisms” for “directed toward determination and identification of means”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 92 and 907 are identical, and substituted “the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.)” for “§

32.1-290

” in subsection A; substituted “the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.)” for “§

32.1-295

” in subdivision C 1; and substituted “the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (§ 32.1-291.1 et seq.)” for “subsections E and F of §

32.1-290

” in subdivision D 3.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 82 inserted “therapy, education” and made a related change in subdivison C 1.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 834, in subsection A, inserted “operated” in the first sentence and inserted the second sentence; and inserted “operate” in subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 25 and 55 are identical, and substituted “subsection H of § 46.2-342” for “subsection F of § 46.2-342” in subsection B and subdivision C 1.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by cc. 135 and 743 are almost identical, and in subsection B, substituted “G of § 46.2-342” for “H of § 46.2-342”; and in subdivision D 3, deleted “or subsection I of § 46.2-342” at the end. In addition, c. 743 substituted “G of § 46.2-342” for “H of § 46.2-342” in subdivision C 1.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 15-108 Advance Medical Directive, et seq. No. 16-1913 Advance Medical Directive, et seq.

§ 32.1-293.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-294.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 959.

§ 32.1-295.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-296.
Determination of death.

The provisions of § 54.1-2972 shall be applicable for the purposes of this article.

History.

1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-297.
Action for implied warranty in connection with transfer of blood or human tissue.

No action for implied warranty shall lie for the procurement, processing, distribution or use of whole blood, plasma, blood products, blood derivatives and other human tissue such as corneas, bones, or organs for the purpose of injecting, transfusing or transplanting any of them into the human body except where any defects or impurities in the said whole blood, plasma, blood products, blood derivatives and other human tissue such as corneas, bones, or organs are detectable by the use of established medical and technological procedures employed pursuant to the standards of local medical practice.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-364.2; 1968, c. 81; 1979, c. 711.

Law Review.

For note, “Regulating the Sale of Human Organs,” see 71 Va. L. Rev. 1015 (1985).

Research References.

Treatise on Health Care Law (Matthew Bender). Chapter 21 Death and Organ Transplantation. § 21.02 Donation of Dead Bodies and Bodily Parts. Hooper, Lundy & Bookman, Inc. General Editors; Lundy, Lead Editor.

§ 32.1-297.1.
The Virginia Transplant Council.

The Virginia Transplant Council (hereinafter referred to as the Council) is hereby established to fulfill the following duties:

To create, compile, maintain, and modify as necessary the Virginia Donor Registry established in §

32.1-292.2

in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Health and the administration of the Department of Health;

To conduct public education and information services relating to organ, tissue, and eye donation in the Commonwealth;

To coordinate organ, tissue, and eye donation activities in the Commonwealth;

To provide a forum for discussion among its members of any issues of which it may be apprised that could impact the effectiveness of its activities and the relationship between the public and its members; and

To advise the Board and Department of Health concerning organ, tissue, and eye donation activities, procurement, and transplantation efforts in Virginia.

The Council shall establish such bylaws as may be necessary for its operation, consistent with state and federal law.

The membership of the Council shall consist of the following organizations, each of whom shall have one vote: INOVA Fairfax Hospital, Henrico Doctors’ Hospital, LifeNet Health, Lion’s Medical Eye Bank and Research Center of Eastern Virginia, Mountain Regional Donor Services, Old Dominion Eye Foundation, Inc., Sentara Norfolk General Hospital, University of Virginia Health System, Virginia Commonwealth University Health System, Washington Regional Transplant Community, Children’s Hospital of The King’s Daughters, and any successor organization thereof that remains directly involved in activities related to organ, tissue, or eye donation, procurement, or transplantation in Virginia, and one representative of donor families and one representative of transplant recipients. The Council shall elect, from among its membership, such officers as its bylaws require to serve for the terms established in such bylaws.

The Council shall also elect the representatives of donor families and transplant recipients who shall serve for terms established in the bylaws.

In order to provide flexibility and coordination and to prevent duplication of efforts, the Council may agree to extend nonvoting, associate membership on the Council to representatives of other organizations, agencies, or experts, public or private, who (i) are directly involved in or (ii) provide education or information on organ, tissue, or eye donation, procurement, or transplantation. Such membership (a) shall be extended to the Virginia Departments of Education, Health, Health Professions, and Motor Vehicles, and the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association; (b) may include at least one representative of the faith community and one representative of local public schools; and (c) may be extended to other organizations, agencies, or experts as the Council deems appropriate.

In addition to the duties assigned in subsection A, the Council (i) shall inform the Board regarding the Council’s activities; (ii) shall conduct and coordinate professional education and informational activities as they relate to organ, tissue, and eye donation, procurement, and transplantation efforts; and (iii) as appropriate, may conduct its activities in coordination with other organizations whose goals are related to organ, tissue, or eye donation, procurement, or transplantation. To achieve its purposes efficiently and effectively, the Council may conduct its activities in partnership with its member organizations or may contract for services with appropriate parties.

The Council, or the Board on behalf of the Council, may apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources to enable the Council to further its purposes and carry out its duties, and the Council may comply with such conditions and requirements as may be imposed on it in connection therewith.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Donor Registry and Public Awareness Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller as a revolving fund and shall consist of such gifts, grants, or donations as may be received pursuant to this subsection and any moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to support the Council’s education and information programs. Moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Council shall administer funds made available to it from the Fund and shall disburse such funds in accordance with the purposes of this article.

The Council may employ such employees, permanent and temporary, as it may deem necessary for the proper performance of its duties and shall determine their qualifications and duties. Employees of the Council shall be compensated in the manner provided by the Council and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.). Actual expenses incurred by the members of the Council in the performance of their duties and actual costs of hiring and compensating employees of the Council shall be paid from the Virginia Donor Registry and Public Awareness Fund.

In addition to such other reports as may be required by the Commissioner or the Board, on or before September 30 of each year, the Council shall submit a report on its activities, programs, and funding in the previous fiscal year to the Board.

History.

1985, c. 412; 1990, c. 336; 1991, c. 37; 1997, c. 799; 2002, c. 467; 2006, c. 166; 2009, c. 834; 2012, c. 692; 2022, c. 72.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 336, cl. 2 repealed Acts 1985, c. 412, cl. 2, which had provided for expiration of this section on July 1, 1991.

Acts 2006, c. 166 provides: “Whereas, in past years, the organ procurement organizations and eye banks of Virginia were required to contact the Virginia State Police to have the Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV) records checked for organ and tissue donor designations; however, in 2000, the General Assembly mandated the establishment of an organ and tissue donor registry by the Virginia Transplant Council; and

“Whereas, requiring two years to develop, online services were, remarkably, initiated shortly thereafter in 2003, thus allowing Virginians to register online as organ and tissue donors; and

“Whereas, with the budget crisis of 2003, the Virginia Transplant Council lost its funding and its staff while still retaining its statutory responsibilities for the maintenance of the donor registry; and

“Whereas, the members of the Virginia Transplant Council have continued to share the costs of maintaining the organ and tissue donor registry; however, funds to maintain the valuable services of the organ and tissue donor registry will soon be depleted, leaving the registry dormant, its usefulness to deteriorate, and eventually causing its closure; and

“Whereas, the donor registry has saved money by eliminating the need to contact the State Police for information held by the Department of Motor Vehicles, thereby freeing up law-enforcement officers for important public safety functions; and

“Whereas, analysis of registry data proves that, since its initiation, the donor registry has saved lives by increasing donations and improving family acceptance of organ and tissue donation when the loved one has made an easily ascertainable and verifiable decision; now, therefore,”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 467 added the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A; in subsection B, deleted “and” preceding “Washington Regional Transplant Consortium,” inserted “and one representative of donor families and one representative of transplant recipients,” and added the second paragraph; and inserted “and shall include at least one representative of the faith community and one representative of local public schools” in the final sentence of subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 166 rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, deleted “the Bone Marrow Transplantation Program at Medical College of Virginia Hospitals, the Bone Marrow Program at Virginia Blood Services, the Bone Marrow Transplantation Program at the University of Virginia Medical Center, Carolina Organ Procurement Agency” preceding “INOVA Fairfax Hospital” and “Life Resources Regional Donor Center” following “LifeNet” and substituted “Mountain Regional Donor Services” for “Medical College of Virginia Hospitals,” “Old Dominion Eye Foundation, Inc.” for “Old Dominion Eye Bank, Roanoke Memorial Hospitals,” and “University of Virginia Health System, Virginia Commonwealth University Health System” for “University of Virginia Health Sciences Center, Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, Virginia’s Organ Procurement Agency”; in subsection C, inserted the clause (a) through (c) designations, “and the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association” in clause (a), and made related changes; and in subsection D, in the first sentence, added “In addition to the duties assigned in subsection A,” in clause (i), substituted “inform” for “advise” and deleted “the administration of” preceding “the Council’s activities, inserted “professional” in clause (ii), and in clause (iii), inserted “and cooperation” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 834, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “Health” following “LifeNet,” deleted “South Eastern Organ Procurement Foundation” following “Norfolk General Hospital” and substituted “Community” for “Consortium”; rewrote clause (iii) in the first sentence of subsection D; substituted “Virginia Donor Registry and Public Awareness Fund” for “Virginia Transplant Council Education Fund” in the second sentence of subsection F; and made a related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 692, in subsection C, in the last sentence, substituted “membership (a) shall” for “membership shall (a)” and inserted “Health” preceding Health Professions”; and substituted “the Council (i) shall inform the Board regarding the Council’s activities; (ii) shall conduct” for “the Council shall (i) inform the Board regarding the Council’s activities; (ii) conduct” in the first sentence of subsection D; deleted subsection E, which formerly read: “The State Board of Health shall be designated the budgetary administrator of the Council and shall receive such funds as may be provided by the General Assembly in the appropriation act for the operation and administration of the Council. The Board, in consultation with the Commissioner, shall oversee the activities and programs of the Council and shall require the fiscal and substantive reports of the Council to be submitted on or before June 30 of each year”; redesignated former subsection F as subsection E; in subsection E, rewrote the first paragraph and in the last paragraph, deleted “which shall be administered by the Board, in consultation with the Commissioner” from the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence; and added subsection F.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 72 inserted “Children’s Hospital of The King’s Daughters” in subsection B in the first paragraph; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-297.2.
Discrimination prohibited.

As used in this section:“Auxiliary aids or services” means an aid or service that is used to provide information to an individual with a cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability in a format or manner that allows the individual to better understand the information. “Auxiliary aids or services” includes (i) qualified interpreters or other effective methods of making aurally delivered materials available to persons with hearing impairments; (ii) qualified readers, taped texts, texts in accessible electronic format, or other effective methods of making visually delivered materials available to persons with visual impairments; (iii) supported decision-making services, including (a) use of a support individual to communicate information to the individual with a disability, ascertain the wishes of the individual, or assist the individual in making decisions; (b) disclosure of information to a legal guardian, authorized representative, or another individual designated by the individual with a disability for such purpose, as long as the disclosure is consistent with state and federal law; and (c) if an individual has a court-appointed guardian or other individual responsible for making medical decisions on behalf of the individual, any measures used to ensure that the individual is included in decisions involving the individual’s health care and that medical decisions are made in accordance with the individual’s own expressed interests; and (iv) any other aid or service that is used to provide information in a format that is easily understandable and accessible to individuals with cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability, including assistive communication technology.“Covered entity” means any licensed provider of health care services, including any health care practitioner licensed by a health regulatory board of the Department of Health Professions, hospital, nursing facility, laboratory, intermediate care facility, psychiatric residential treatment facility, institution for individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities, or prison health center, and any entity responsible for matching anatomical gift donors to potential recipients.“Eligible individual” means an individual who is a candidate to receive an anatomical gift for transplantation and who is otherwise eligible to receive an anatomical gift for transplantation, with or without auxiliary aids and services.“Eligible individual with a disability” means an eligible individual with a cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability.“Services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation” means referral to a transplant center or specialist; inclusion on an organ, eye, or tissue transplantation waiting list; evaluation; surgery and related health care services; counseling; or post-transplantation treatment and services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation.

An eligible individual shall not be deemed ineligible to receive an anatomical gift or denied services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation solely because he is an eligible individual with a disability. However, an eligible individual may be deemed ineligible to receive an anatomical gift or denied services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation to the extent that his cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability has been determined by a health care provider, following an individualized evaluation, to be medically significant to the provision of the anatomical gift for organ, eye, or tissue transplantation.

If an eligible individual with a disability has the necessary support system to assist the individual in complying with post-transplantation medical requirements, his inability to independently comply with such post-transplantation medical requirements shall not be deemed to be medically significant.

No covered entity shall (i) place an eligible individual with a disability on an organ transplant waiting list at a position lower in priority than the position at which the eligible individual with a disability would have been placed if he did not have a disability or (ii) refuse insurance coverage for any services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation provided to an eligible individual with a disability.

A covered entity shall (i) make reasonable modifications to its policies, practices, or procedures to allow eligible individuals with disabilities access to services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation and (ii) take all steps necessary to ensure that an eligible individual with a disability is not denied medical services or services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation due to the absence of auxiliary aids or services. A covered entity shall not be required to comply with clause (ii) if the covered entity demonstrates that taking such steps would fundamentally alter the nature of the medical services or other services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation or would result in an undue burden for the covered entity.

In cases in which a violation of this section is alleged to have occurred, a petition shall be filed in the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which the violation is alleged to have occurred or in which the individual is located. Any petition filed pursuant to this subsection shall be given priority on the docket. Any order of the court entered on such petition may grant injunctive relief, including (i) requiring auxiliary aids or services to be made available to an eligible individual with a disability; (ii) requiring the modification of a policy, practice, or procedure of a covered entity; or (iii) requiring that facilities be made accessible to and usable by an eligible individual with a disability.

The provisions of this section shall apply to each part of the anatomical gift and organ, eye, or tissue transplantation process.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require the provision of medically inappropriate services related to organ, eye, or tissue transplantation.

History.

2020, cc. 217, 218.